Utah statutes.
54-7-10.   Orders on hearings -- Time effective.
(1)  Orders of the commission shall take effect and become operative on the
date issued, except as otherwise provided in the order.
(2)  They shall continue in force for the period designated in the order, or
until changed or abrogated by the commission.
